California statutes. Business and Professions Code
The registrar may accept the qualifications of an applicant who is licensed as a contractor in a similar classification in another state if that state accepts the qualifications of a contractor licensed in this state for purposes of licensure in that other state, and if the board ascertains, on a case-by-case basis, that the professional qualifications and conditions of good standing for licensure and continued licensure are at least the same or greater in that state as in California. The registrar may waive the trade examination for that applicant if the applicant provides written certification from that other state in which he or she is licensed, that the applicant’s license has been in good standing for the previous five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1326, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

7065.5.

No license shall be issued to a minor, nor to any partnership a partner of which is a minor, nor to any corporation any officer, director or responsible managing employee of which is a minor, nor to any limited liability company any officer, manager, or responsible managing employee of which is a minor, nor to any other kind of business organization in which a minor holds a responsible official position, unless the minor shall first have had a guardian appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 7.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7066.

To obtain an original license, an applicant shall submit to the registrar an application in writing containing the statement that the applicant desires the issuance of a license under the terms of this chapter.

The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the registrar in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the board and shall be accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7066.5.

Any person may obtain blank license application forms from the board or may cause to be printed forms used by or approved by the Registrar of Contractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 13.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7067.6.

(a) Every application form for an original license, for renewal thereof, for reinstatement or for reissuance, including both active and inactive licenses, shall be signed by both the applicant and by the person qualifying on behalf of an individual or firm as referred to in Section 7068.1.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may implement a system that provides for the electronic transmission of an application described in
 subdivision (a) and the acceptance of a digital or electronic signature as part of the filing of those applications.

(2) The board by regulation may specify the form and manner of these transmissions and acceptances, including, but not limited to, the adoption of any protocols necessary to ensure the validity and security of any information, signature, data, or document transmitted electronically or digitally. Upon the effective date of the regulations, the electronic submission of an initial license application or a renewal application, including a digital or electronic signature, shall satisfy the requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   (SB 561)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7068.

(a) The board shall require an applicant to show the degree of knowledge and experience in the classification applied for, and the general knowledge of the building, safety, health, and lien laws of the state and of the administrative principles of the contracting business that the board deems necessary for the safety and protection of the public.

(b) An applicant shall qualify in regard to their experience and knowledge in one of the following ways:

(1) If an individual, they shall qualify by personal appearance or by the appearance of their responsible managing employee who is qualified for the same license classification
 as the classification being applied for.

(2) If a partnership or a limited partnership, it shall qualify by the appearance of a general partner or by the appearance of a responsible managing employee who is qualified for the same license classification as the classification being applied for.

(3) If a corporation, or any other combination or organization, it shall qualify by the appearance of a responsible managing officer or responsible managing employee who is qualified for the same
 license classification as the classification being applied for.

(4) If a limited liability company, it shall qualify by the appearance of a responsible managing officer, a responsible managing manager, responsible managing member, or a responsible managing employee who is qualified for the same license classification as the classification being applied for.

(c) (1) For purposes of this chapter, “a responsible managing employee” means an individual who is a bona fide employee of the applicant and is actively engaged in the classification of work for which that responsible managing employee is the qualifying person on behalf of the applicant.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision,
 the following definitions apply:

(A) “Bona fide employee of the applicant” means an employee who is permanently employed by the applicant.

(B) “Actively engaged” means working 32 hours per week, or 80 percent of the total hours per week that the applicant’s business is in operation, whichever is less.

(d) The board shall, in addition, require an applicant who qualifies by means of a responsible managing employee under either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) to show their general knowledge of the building, safety, health, and lien laws of the state and of the administrative principles of the contracting business as the board deems necessary for the safety and protection of the public.

(e) Except in accordance with Section 7068.1, no person qualifying on behalf of an individual or firm under paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (b) shall hold any other active contractor’s license while acting in the capacity of a qualifying individual pursuant to this section.

(f) At the time of application for renewal of a license, the current qualifying individual shall file a statement with the registrar, on a form prescribed by the registrar, verifying their capacity as a qualifying individual to the licensee.

(g) Statements made by or on behalf of an applicant as to the applicant’s experience in the classification applied for shall be verified by a qualified and responsible person. In addition, the registrar
 shall, as specified by board regulation, randomly review a percentage of such statements for their veracity.

(h) The registrar shall review experience gained by applicants from other states to determine whether all of that experience was gained in a lawful manner in that state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 5.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7068.1.

(a) The person qualifying on behalf of an individual or firm under paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 7068 shall be responsible for exercising supervision and control of their employer’s or principal’s construction operations to secure compliance with this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board. This person shall not act in the capacity of the qualifying person for an additional individual or firm unless one of the following conditions exists:

(1) There is a common ownership of at least 20 percent of the equity of each individual or firm for which the person acts in a qualifying capacity.

(2) The additional firm is a subsidiary of or a joint venture with the
 first. “Subsidiary,” as used in this subdivision, means any firm at least 20 percent of the equity of which is owned by the other firm.

(3) With respect to a firm under paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 7068, the majority of the partners, officers, or managers are the same.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a), a qualifying individual may act as the qualifier for no more than three firms in any one-year period.

(c) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Firm” means a partnership, a limited partnership, a corporation, a limited liability company, or any other combination or organization described in Section 7068.

(2) “Person” is limited to natural persons, notwithstanding the definition of “person” in Section 7025.

(3) “Supervision and control” means direct supervision or control or monitoring and being available to assist others to whom direct supervision and control has been delegated.

(4) “Direct supervision or control” means any of the following:

(A) Supervising construction operations.

(B) Managing construction activities by making technical and administrative decisions.

(C) Checking jobs for proper workmanship.

(D) Supervision on construction sites.

(d) The board shall require every applicant or licensee qualifying by the appearance of a qualifying individual to submit detailed information on the qualifying individual’s duties and responsibilities for supervision and control of the applicant’s construction operations.

(e) Violation of this section shall constitute a cause for disciplinary action and shall be punishable as a misdemeanor by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, by a fine of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000), but not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 8.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7068.2.

(a) If the responsible managing officer, responsible managing employee, responsible managing member, or responsible managing manager disassociates from the licensed entity, the licensee or the qualifier shall notify the registrar in writing within 90 days after the date of disassociation. The licensee shall have 90 days after the date of disassociation in which to replace the qualifier. Upon failure to replace the qualifier within 90 days after the date of disassociation, the license shall be automatically suspended or the classification removed at the end of the 90 days.

(b) To replace a responsible managing officer, responsible managing employee, responsible managing member, or responsible managing manager, the licensee shall file an application as prescribed by
 the registrar, accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter, designating an individual to qualify as required by this chapter.

(c) Upon failure of the licensee or the qualifier to notify the registrar of the disassociation of the qualifier within 90 days after the date of disassociation, the license shall be automatically suspended or the classification removed and the qualifier removed from the license effective the date the written notification is received at the board’s headquarters office.

(d) The person qualifying on behalf of a licensee under Section 7068 shall be responsible for the licensee’s construction operations until the date of disassociation or the date the board receives the written notification of disassociation, whichever is later.

(e) (1) Upon a showing of good cause by the
 licensee, the registrar may review and accept a petition for one 90-day extension to replace the qualifier immediately following the initial 90-day period described in subdivision (a) only under one or more of the following circumstances:

(A) If the licensee is disputing the date of disassociation.

(B) If the responsible managing officer, employee, member, or manager has died.

(C) If there has been a delay in processing the application to replace the qualifier that is out of the applicant’s control and it is the responsibility of the board or another state or federal agency that is relied upon in the application process.

(2) This petition shall be received within 90 days after the date of disassociation or death or delay. The petition shall only be
 considered if an application to replace the qualifier as prescribed by the registrar is on file with the board. Under the circumstances described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1), the licensee shall have no more than a total of 180 days after the date of disassociation or death in which to replace the qualifier.

(f) Failure of the licensee or the qualifier to notify the registrar of the qualifier’s disassociation within 90 days after the date of disassociation shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 2.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7068.5.

It is a misdemeanor for any person other than the examinee named in the application to take the qualifying examination on behalf of an applicant for a contractor’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 491.)
-------------------------------------------

7068.7.

Any person who obtains and provides for another the qualifying examination, or any part thereof, when not authorized to do so, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

7069.

(a) An applicant, and each officer, director, partner, manager, associate, and responsible managing employee thereof, shall not have committed acts or crimes that are grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(b) As part of an application for a contractor’s license, the board shall require an applicant to furnish a full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting a criminal history record check. Fingerprints furnished pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in an electronic format if readily available. Requests for alternative methods of furnishing fingerprints are subject to the approval of the registrar. The board shall use the fingerprints furnished by an
 applicant to obtain criminal history information on the applicant from the Department of Justice and the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation, and the board may obtain any subsequent arrest information that is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 11.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7069.1.

(a) Upon notification of an arrest of a member of the personnel of a licensee or a home improvement salesperson, the registrar, by first-class mail to the last official address of record, may require the arrestee to provide proof of the disposition of the matter.

(b) The proof required by this section shall be satisfactory for carrying out the purposes of this chapter, and at the registrar’s discretion may include, but is not limited to, certified court documents, certified court orders, or sentencing documents. Any proof required by this section shall be received by the registrar within 90 days of the date of the disposition, or within 90 days of the registrar’s demand for information if that date is later.

(c) Failure to comply with the provisions of this section constitutes cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7070.

An applicant shall show that he or she has never been denied a license or had a license revoked for reasons that would preclude the granting of the license applied for. Where the board has denied an application for license under this chapter or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 480) of Division 1.5, it shall, in its decision, or in its notice under subdivision (b) of Section 485, inform the applicant of the earliest date that the applicant may reapply for a license, which shall be one year from the effective date of the decision or service of notice under subdivision (b) of Section 485, unless the board prescribes an earlier date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.

No license shall be issued to a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other combination or organization if a responsible officer or director of the corporation, or other combination or organization, or a partner of the partnership, or a manager or officer of the limited liability company, or any member of an organization seeking licensure under this chapter does not meet the qualifications required of an applicant other than those qualifications relating to knowledge and experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 15.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the holder of a current valid license under this chapter who has entered or enters the armed forces of the United States may designate a responsible managing person or persons to act for him while in the armed forces and until one year after his discharge therefrom, after which time the authority to so act for the licensee shall terminate. The renewal fee shall be paid for any such licensee so designating others to act for him.

Any license shall remain in full force and effect for 30 days after the entrance of the licensee into the armed forces, but he shall prior to the expiration of such 30-day period provide the registrar with the name or names of the persons so designated to conduct his business. The registrar may qualify such persons in any manner he may adopt. Persons so designated shall not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480. 

Persons so designated committing any of the acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480 shall be removed from the business of such licensee after a hearing as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.4.

(a) Each person licensed under the provisions of this chapter and subject to any of the bonding provisions of this article shall maintain the requisite bond as executed by an admitted surety insurer or as deposited with the registrar pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the appropriate amount. Notwithstanding Article 7 (commencing with Section 995.710) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, no other method of deposit, including, but not limited to, a certificate of deposit, shall satisfy a bond requirement under this article.

(b) All existing alternatives in lieu of a bond currently filed with the registrar shall be replaced for a surety bond or the deposit prescribed by
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure by January 1, 2020.

(c) (1) If the board is notified, in writing, of a civil action against the deposit authorized under this section, the deposit or any portion thereof shall not be released for any purpose, except as determined by the court.

(2) If any deposit authorized under this section is insufficient to pay, in full, all claims that have been adjudicated under any action filed in accordance with this section, the amount of the deposit shall be distributed to all claimants in proportion to the amount of their respective claims.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not apply to the bond equivalents described in Section 7159.5 of this chapter.

(e) (1) This section shall be operative on and after January 1, 2019, upon which date the registrar shall thereafter no longer accept alternatives in lieu of a bond, other than as provided in this section.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, in order to comply with the bonding provisions of this article, a person shall only be required to provide information consistent with the requirements for an applicant under Section 30.

(f) All alternatives in lieu of a bond filed with the registrar before January 1, 2019, and any lawful money or cashier’s check deposited pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure after January 1, 2019, shall be subject to the following limitations periods:

(1) Any
 action, other than an action to recover wages or fringe benefits, against a deposit given in lieu of a contractor’s bond or bond of a qualifying individual filed by an active licensee shall be brought within three years after the expiration of the license period during which the act or omission occurred, or within three years of the date the license of the active licensee was inactivated, canceled, or revoked by the board, whichever occurs first.

(2) Any action, other than an action to recover wages or fringe benefits, against a deposit given in lieu of a disciplinary bond filed by an active licensee pursuant to Section 7071.8 shall be brought within three years after the expiration of the license period during which the act or omission occurred, or within three years of the date the license of the active licensee was inactivated, canceled, or revoked by the board, or within three years after the last date for which a deposit given in lieu of a
 disciplinary bond filed pursuant to Section 7071.8 was required, whichever date is first.

(3) A claim to recover wages or fringe benefits shall be brought within six months from the date that the wage or fringe benefit delinquencies were discovered, but in no event shall a civil action thereon be brought later than two years from the date the wage or fringe benefit contributions were due.

(g) In any case in which a claim is filed against an alternative given in lieu of a bond filed with the registrar before January 1, 2019, or deposited with the registrar pursuant to subdivision (a), by any employee or by an employee organization on behalf of an employee, concerning wages or fringe benefits based upon the employee’s employment, claims for the nonpayment shall be filed with the Labor Commissioner. The Labor Commissioner shall, pursuant to the authority vested by Section 96.5 of the
 Labor Code, conduct hearings to determine whether or not the wages or fringe benefits should be paid to the complainant. Upon a finding by the commissioner that the wages or fringe benefits should be paid to the complainant, the commissioner shall notify the registrar of the findings. The registrar shall not make payment from the deposit on the basis of findings by the commissioner for a period of 10 days following determination of the findings. If, within the period, the complainant or the contractor files written notice with the registrar and the commissioner of an intention to seek judicial review of the findings pursuant to Section 11523 of the Government Code, the registrar shall not make payment if an action is actually filed, except as determined by the court. If, thereafter, no action is filed within 60 days following determination of findings by the commissioner, the registrar shall make payment from the deposit to the complainant.

(h) Legal fees may not be charged by the board against any alternative given in lieu of a bond filed with the registrar before January 1, 2019, or deposited with the registrar pursuant to subdivision (a). In addition, the board shall not be liable for any legal fees or costs in any action, as described in subdivision (c), against any deposit authorized under this section, regardless of when it was filed with the registrar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   (AB 521)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.5.

The contractor’s bond required by this article shall be executed by an admitted surety in favor of the State of California, in a form acceptable to the registrar and filed with the registrar by the licensee or applicant. The contractor’s bond shall be for the benefit of the following:

(a) A homeowner contracting for home improvement upon the homeowner’s personal family residence damaged as a result of a violation of this chapter by the licensee.

(b) A property owner contracting for the construction of a single-family dwelling who is damaged as a result of a violation of this chapter by the licensee. That property owner shall only recover
 under this subdivision if the single-family dwelling is not intended for sale or offered for sale at the time the damages were incurred.

(c) A person damaged as a result of a willful and deliberate violation of this chapter by the licensee, or by the fraud of the licensee in the execution or performance of a construction contract.

(d) An employee of the licensee damaged by the licensee’s failure to pay wages.

(e) A person or entity, including a laborer described in subdivision (b) of Section 8024 of the Civil Code, to which a portion of the compensation of an employee of a licensee is paid by agreement with that employee or the collective bargaining agent of that employee, damaged as the result of the licensee’s failure to pay fringe benefits for its employees, including, but not limited to, employer payments
 described in Section 1773.1 of the Labor Code and regulations thereunder (without regard to whether the work was performed on a private or public work). Damage to a person or entity under this subdivision is limited to actual employer payments required to be made on behalf of employees of the licensee, as part of the overall compensation of those employees, which the licensee fails to pay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 2.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.6.

(a) The board shall require as a condition precedent to the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, renewal, or continued maintenance of a license, that the applicant or licensee file or have on file a contractor’s bond in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(b) Excluding the claims brought by the beneficiaries specified in subdivision (a) of Section 7071.5, the aggregate liability of a surety on claims brought against a bond required by this section shall not exceed the sum of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). The bond proceeds in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) shall be reserved exclusively for the claims of the beneficiaries specified in subdivision (a) of Section 7071.5. However, nothing in
 this section shall be construed so as to prevent any beneficiary specified in subdivision (a) of Section 7071.5 from claiming or recovering the full measure of the bond required by this section.

(c) A bond shall not be required of a holder of a license that has been inactivated on the official records of the board during the period the license is inactive.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, as a condition precedent to licensure, the board may require an applicant to post a contractor’s bond in twice the amount required pursuant to subdivision (a) until the time that the license is renewed, under the following conditions:

(1) The applicant has either been convicted of a violation of Section 7028 or has been cited pursuant to Section 7028.7.

(2) If the
 applicant has been cited pursuant to Section 7028.7, the citation has been reduced to a final order of the registrar.

(3) The violation of Section 7028, or the basis for the citation issued pursuant to Section 7028.7, constituted a substantial injury to the public.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 16) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 367, Sec. 17.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.6.5.

(a) The board shall require, as a condition precedent to the issuance, reissuance, reinstatement, reactivation, renewal, or continued valid use of a limited liability company license, that the applicant or licensee file or have on file a surety bond in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(b) The bond required by this section shall be executed by an admitted surety in favor of the State of California, in a form acceptable to the registrar and filed with the registrar, electronically or otherwise, by the applicant or licensee.

(c) The bond required by this section shall be for the benefit of any employee damaged by his or
 her employer’s failure to pay wages, interest on wages, or fringe benefits and is intended to serve as an additional safeguard for workers employed by or contracted to work for a limited liability company.

(d) If an applicant or licensee subject to subdivision (a) is also a party to a collective bargaining agreement, the bond required by this section shall also cover, in addition to the coverage described in subdivision (c), welfare fund contributions, pension fund contributions, and apprentice program contributions.

(e) The bond required by this section shall not be applicable to a licensee whose license has been inactivated on the official records of the board during the period the license is inactive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 13.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.7.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the registrar shall accept a bond required by Section 7071.6, 7071.6.5, 7071.8, or 7071.9 as of the effective date shown on the bond, if the bond is received by the registrar within 90 days after that date, and shall reinstate the license to which the bond pertains, if otherwise eligible, retroactive to the effective date of the bond.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the registrar shall accept a bond as of the effective date shown on the bond, even if the bond is not received by the registrar within 90 days after that date, upon a showing by the licensee, on a form acceptable to the registrar, that the failure to have a bond on file was
 due to circumstances beyond the control of the licensee. The registrar shall reinstate the license to which the bond pertains, if otherwise eligible, retroactive to the effective date of the bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 14.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.8.

(a) This section applies to an application for a license, for renewal or restoration of a license, an application to change officers or members of a corporation or a limited liability company, or for continued valid use of a license which has been disciplined, whether or not the disciplinary action has been stayed, made by any of the following persons or firms:

(1) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked as a result of disciplinary action, or a person who was a qualifying individual for a licensee at any time during which cause for disciplinary action occurred resulting in suspension or revocation of the licensee’s license, whether or not the qualifying individual had knowledge or participated in the prohibited act or omission.

(2) A person who was an officer, director, manager, partner, or member of the personnel of record of a licensee at any time during which cause for disciplinary action occurred resulting in suspension or revocation of the licensee’s license and who had knowledge of or participated in the act or omission which was the cause for the disciplinary action.

(3) A partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, or association of which an existing or new officer, director, manager, partner, qualifying person, or member of the personnel of record has had a license suspended or revoked as a result of disciplinary action.

(4) A partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, or association of which a member of the personnel of record, including, but not limited to, an officer, director, manager, partner, or
 qualifying person was, likewise, a manager, officer, director, or partner of a licensee at any time during which cause for disciplinary action occurred resulting in suspension or revocation of the license, and who had knowledge of or participated in the act or omission which was the cause for the disciplinary action.

(b) The board shall require as a condition precedent to the issuance, reissuance, renewal, or restoration of a license to the applicant, or to the approval of an application to change officers of a corporation or a limited liability company, or removal of suspension, or to the continued valid use of a license which has been suspended or revoked, but which suspension or revocation has been stayed, that the applicant or licensee file or have on file a contractor’s bond in a sum to be fixed by the registrar based upon the seriousness of the violation, but which sum shall not be less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) nor more
 than 10 times that amount required by Section 7071.6.

(c) The bond is in addition to, may not be combined with, and does not replace any other type of bond required by this chapter. The bond shall remain on file with the registrar for a period of at least two years and for any additional time that the registrar determines. The bond period shall run only while the license is current, active, and in good standing, and shall be extended until the license has been current, active, and in good standing for the required period. Each applicant or licensee shall be required to file only one disciplinary contractor’s bond of the type described in this section for each application or license subject to this bond requirement.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 18) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 367, Sec. 19.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.9.

(a) (1) If the qualifying individual, as referred to in Sections 7068 and 7068.1, is neither the proprietor, a general partner, nor a joint licensee, the qualifying individual shall file or have on file a qualifying individual’s bond as provided in Section 7071.10 in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). This bond is in addition to, and shall not be combined with, any contractor’s bond required by Sections 7071.5 to 7071.8, inclusive, and is required for the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, or continued valid use of a license.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to a federally recognized tribe or a participating tribe.

(b) Excluding the claims brought by the
 beneficiaries specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7071.10, the aggregate liability of a surety on claims brought against the bond required by this section shall not exceed the sum of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). The bond proceeds in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) shall be reserved exclusively for the claims of the beneficiaries specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7071.10. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any beneficiary specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7071.10 from claiming or recovering the full measure of the bond required by this section. This bond is in addition to, and shall not be combined with, any contractor’s bond required by Sections 7071.5 to 7071.8, inclusive, and is required for the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, or continued valid use of a license.

(c) The responsible managing officer of
 a corporation shall not be required to file or have on file a qualifying individual’s bond, if the responsible managing officer owns 10 percent or more of the voting stock of the corporation and certifies to that fact on a form prescribed by the registrar.

(d) The qualifying individual for a limited liability company shall not be required to file or have on file a qualifying individual’s bond if the qualifying individual owns at least a 10-percent membership interest in the limited liability company and certifies to that fact on a form prescribed by the registrar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 9.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.10.

The qualifying individual’s bond required by this article shall be executed by an admitted surety insurer in favor of the State of California, in a form acceptable to the registrar and filed with the registrar by the qualifying individual. The qualifying individual’s bond shall not be required in addition to the contractor’s bond when, as set forth under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 7068, the individual proprietor has qualified for the license by his or her personal appearance, or the qualifier is a general partner as set forth under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 7068. The qualifying individual’s bond shall be for the benefit of the following persons:

(a) A homeowner
 contracting for home improvement upon the homeowner’s personal family residence damaged as a result of a violation of this chapter by the licensee.

(b) A property owner contracting for the construction of a single-family dwelling who is damaged as a result of a violation of this chapter by the licensee. That property owner shall only recover under this subdivision if the single-family dwelling is not intended for sale or offered for sale at the time the damages were incurred.

(c) A person damaged as a result of a willful and deliberate violation of this chapter by the licensee, or by the fraud of the licensee in the execution or performance of a construction contract.

(d) An employee of the licensee damaged by the licensee’s failure to pay wages.

(e) A
 person or entity, including a laborer described in subdivision (b) of Section 8024 of the Civil Code, to which a portion of the compensation of an employee of a licensee is paid by agreement with that employee or the collective bargaining agent of that employee, that is damaged as the result of the licensee’s failure to pay fringe benefits for its employees including, but not limited to, employer payments described in Section 1773.1 of the Labor Code and regulations adopted thereunder (without regard to whether the work was performed on a public or private work). Damage to a person or entity under this subdivision is limited to employer payments required to be made on behalf of employees of the licensee, as part of the overall compensation of those employees, which the licensee fails to pay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 3.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.11.

(a) The aggregate liability of a surety on a claim for wages and fringe benefits brought against a bond required by this article, other than a bond required by Section 7071.8, shall not exceed the sum of four thousand dollars ($4,000). If a bond required by this article is insufficient to pay all claims in full, the sum of the bond shall be distributed to all claimants in proportion to the amount of their respective claims.

(b) No license may be renewed, reissued, or reinstated while a judgment or admitted claim in excess of the amount of the bond remains unsatisfied.

(c) Except for claims covered by subdivision (d),
 any action against a bond required under this article, excluding the judgment bond specified under Section 7071.17, shall be brought in accordance with the following:
